Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-100.11 of Title 70, unless

there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 2528 Page 1

A. Each school district board of education in this state shall

adopt a policy regarding sex trafficking and exploitation prevention

and education programs for students.

B. Each school district board of education in this state shall

provide schoolwide education programs to all students in grades six

through twelve and staff addressing sex trafficking and exploitation

prevention and awareness.

C. The State Department of Education shall develop and make

available to every public school that serves sixth through twelfth

grade in this state curriculum that shall be taught as a stand-alone

unit of instruction regarding human trafficking with an emphasis on

sex trafficking. The curriculum shall be age appropriate and shall

include an emphasis on exploitation prevention. For students in

grades nine through twelve, curriculum shall specifically include

the following:

1. Definitions and nature of sex trafficking and exploitation;

2. Current laws on sex trafficking and exploitation in this

state;

3. Facts and statistics of sex trafficking and exploitation in

this state and throughout the United States;

4. How sex traffickers profile victims;

5. The role of online computer activity;

6. How demand is created and the industries that influence sex

trafficking and exploitation;

Req. No. 2528 Page 2

7. How to identify a potential victim and what to do when a

person identifies a victim;

8. Understanding force, fraud, and coercion;

9. Understanding how traffickers groom a victim;

10. The differences between prostitution and sex trafficking

and exploitation;

11. The role that pornography plays in sex trafficking and

exploitation;

12. Understanding the complexities of abuse, indoctrination,

and manipulation;

13. Understanding the physiological makeup of a sex trafficking

victim;

14. Rescuing victims of sex trafficking and exploitation; and

15. How to engage in the fight against sex trafficking and

exploitation.

D. The State Department of Education shall develop and make

available to every public school that serves sixth through twelfth

grade in this state curriculum that shall be taught as a stand-alone

unit of instruction regarding social media and how students may best

protect themselves from exploitation when using social media and

internet services including, but not limited to, online gaming, chat

rooms, and email. The curriculum shall be age appropriate and shall

be updated annually to respond to changes in social media.



Req. No. 2528 Page 3

E. The State Department of Education may collaborate with

outside organizations including law enforcement agencies to develop

the curriculum required by this section at no cost to the State

Department of Education. The curriculum shall be provided at no

cost to school districts.

F. Curriculum used by a school district pursuant to this

section shall be made available for public inspection on the school

district’s website.

G. The curriculum required in subsections C and D of this

section shall be combined into a single unit.

1. For grades six through eight, the curriculum shall be taught

as a ninety-minute unit divided into forty-five-minute segments over

two (2) days, which may not be consecutive, but each segment shall

be provided no more than one week apart.

2. For grades nine through twelve, the curriculum shall be

taught as a one-hundred-thirty-five-minute unit divided into forty-

five-minute segments over three (3) days, which may not be

consecutive, but each segment shall be provided no more than one

week apart.

H. School districts shall provide parents and legal guardians

of students written notification, which includes an explanation of

the presentation, who the presenter(s) will be, and any organization

with which the presenter is affiliated, at least seven (7) days

prior to presentation of the curriculum. The notification shall

Req. No. 2528 Page 4

incl ude information to parents and legal guardians that they may opt

their student out of the curriculum by providing written notice to

the school district.

I. Each school district board of education may partner with

nonprofit organizations and law enforcement agencies that specialize

in outreach and education programs on sex trafficking and

exploitation to make literature that addresses sex trafficking and

exploitation available and to assist in presenting the curriculum to

students. Literature and assistance provided pursuant to this

subsection shall be at no cost to school districts and shall be

limited in scope to the topics and guidance provided in subsections

B, C, and D of this section. Any literature provided pursuant to

this subsection shall be made available for public inspection on the

school district’s website.

J. The State Department of Education shall develop and make

available to the public on its website a ninety-minute education

video that addresses sex trafficking, exploitation prevention, and

social media use. The program shall be divided into segments not to

exceed twenty (20) minutes each. The Department shall also make

available on its website links to materials that complement the

education video and links to nonprofit organizations that specialize

in outreach and education programs on sex trafficking and

exploitation. The education video required by this subsection shall

address the topics outlined in paragraphs 1 through 15 of subsection

Req. No. 2528 Page 5

C of this section as well as concrete steps that parents and legal

guardians can take to protect children from exploitation.

K. The State Department of Education shall identify resources

and provide exemplar units or sample lesson plans designed to help

teachers provide instruction on the subject matters outlined in this

section.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2027.



60-2-2528 EB 12/4/2025 12:39:00 PM































Req. No. 2528 Page 6